District of Columbia statutes.
2-1226.04

Definition of Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone.

For the purpose of this subchapter, the term “Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone” means:

(1)

Interstate 395 and all rights-of-way of Interstate 395, within the District, except for the portion of Interstate 395 that is north of E Street, S.W., or S.E.;

(2)

All land between that portion of Interstate 395 that is south of E Street, S.W., or S.E., and the Anacostia River or Washington Channel;

(3)

All land between that portion of Interstate 695, and all rights-of-way, that are south of E Street, S.W. or S.E., and the Anacostia River;

(4)

The portion of Interstate 295 that is north of the Anacostia River, within the District, and all rights-of-way of that portion of Interstate 295;

(5)

All land between that portion of Interstate 295 that is north of the Anacostia River and the Anacostia River;

(6)

The portions of:

(A)

The Anacostia Freeway that are north or east of the intersection of the Anacostia Freeway and Defense Boulevard and all rights-of-way of that portion of the Anacostia Freeway;

(B)

Kenilworth Avenue that extend to the northeast from the Anacostia Freeway to Eastern Avenue; and

(C)

Interstate 295, including its rights-of-way, that are east of the Anacostia River and that extend to the southwest from the Anacostia Freeway to Defense Boulevard.

(7)

All land between those portions of the Anacostia Freeway, Kenilworth Avenue, and Interstate 295 described in paragraph (6) of this section and the Anacostia River;

(8)

All land that is adjacent to the Anacostia River and designated as parks, recreation, and open space on the District of Columbia Generalized Land Use Map, dated January 2002, except for the land that is:

(A)

North of New York Avenue, N.E.;

(B)

East of the Anacostia Freeway; including rights-of-way of the Anacostia Freeway;

(C)

East of the portion of Kenilworth Avenue that extends to the northeast from the Anacostia Freeway to Eastern Avenue;

(D)

East of the portion of Interstate 295, including its rights-of-way, that is east of the Anacostia River and that extends to the southwest from the Anacostia Freeway to Defense Boulevard, but excluding the portion of 295 and its rights-of-way that go to the northwest across the Anacostia River;

(E)

Contiguous to that portion of the Suitland Parkway that is south of Martin Luther King, Jr. Avenue; or

(F)

South of a line drawn along, and as a continuation both east and west of the center line of the portion of Defense Boulevard between Brookley Avenue, S.W., and Mitscher Road, S.W.;

(9)

All land, excluding Eastern High School, that is:

(A)

Adjacent to the land described in paragraph (8) of this section;

(B)

West of the Anacostia River; and

(C)

Designated as a local public facility on the District of Columbia Generalized Land Use Map, dated January 2002;

(10)

All land that is:

(A)

South or east of that portion of Potomac Avenue, S.E., between Interstate 295 and 19th Street, S.E.; and

(B)

West or north of the Anacostia River;

(11)

The portion of the Anacostia River within the District; and

(12)

The Washington Channel.

History

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 404, 55 DCR 1689
Oct. 23, 2012, D.C. Law 19-192, § 2(a), 59 DCR 10174

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1226.33.

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-192 substituted “Interstate 395 that is north of E Street, S.W., or S.E.” for “Interstate 95 that is north of D Street, N.W., and N.E.” in (1); substituted “south of E Street, S.W., or S.E., and the Anacostia River or Washington Channel” for “south of D Street, N.W., and N.E., and the Washington Channel” in (2); substituted “Interstate 695, and all rights-of-way, that are south of E Street, S.W. or S.E.” for “Interstate 395 that is south of D Street, N.W. and N.E.” in (3); rewrote (6) and (8); substituted “paragraph (8) of this section” for “paragraph (7) of this section” in (9)(A); and substituted “and” for “or” at the end of (9)(b).

Temporary Addition of Section

D.C. Law 17-53, § 405, added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 405. Definition of Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone.
“For the purposes of this title, the term ‘Anacostia Waterfront Development Zone’ shall consist of the following:
“(1) Interstate 395 and all rights-of-way of Interstate 395, except for the portion of Interstate 95 that is north of D Street, N.W., and N.E.;
“(2) All land between that portion of Interstate 395 that is south of D Street, N.W., and N.E., and the Washington Channel;
“(3) All land between that portion of Interstate 395 that is south of D Street, N.W., and N.E., and the Anacostia River;
“(4) The portion of Interstate 295 that is north of the Anacostia River and all rights-of-way of that portion of Interstate 295;
“(5) All land between that portion of Interstate 295 that is north of the Anacostia River and the Anacostia River;
“(6) The portion of the Anacostia Freeway that is north or east of the intersection of the Anacostia Freeway and Defense Boulevard and all rights-of-way of that portion of the Anacostia Freeway;
“(7) All land between that portion of the Anacostia Freeway described in paragraph (6) of this subsection and the Anacostia River;
“(8) All land that is adjacent to the Anacostia River and designated as parks, recreation, and open space on the District of Columbia Generalized Land Use Map dated January 2002, except for the land that is:
“(A) North of New York Avenue, N.E.;
“(B) East of the Anacostia Freeway;
“(C) Contiguous to that portion of the Suitland Parkway that is south of Martin Luther King Jr. Avenue;
“(D) South of a line drawn along, and as a continuation both east and west of, the center line of the portion of Defense Boulevard between Brookley Avenue, S.W., and Mitscher Road, S.W.;
“(9) All land, excluding Eastern High School, that is:
“(A) Adjacent to the land described in paragraph (7) of this subsection;
“(B) West of the Anacostia River; or
“(C) Designated as a local public facility on the District of Columbia Generalized Land Use Map;
“(10) All land that is:
“(A) South or east of that portion of Potomac Avenue, S.E., between Interstate 295 and 19th Street, S.E.; and
“(B) West or north of the Anacostia River;
“(11) The portion of the Anacostia River within the District; and
“(12) The Washington Channel.”
Section 702(b) of D.C. Law 17-53 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 405 of National Capital Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-71, July 20, 2007, 54 DCR 7390).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 405 of National Capitol Revitalization Corporation and Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Reorganization Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-152, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10900).